Hawaii, session 2026, SB2004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that unlawful outdoor advertising and display of billboards cause multiple problems for public safety, waste management, and community pollution. Outdoor advertising materials often deteriorate and create waste that must be removed by public agencies or utilities, ultimately increasing maintenance costs for the State, counties, and local communities. The legislature further finds that illegal postings are specifically problematic when attached to utility poles.  These illegal postings can obstruct drivers' sightlines, contribute to distracted vehicular behavior, and create major safety hazards.  Therefore, the legislature finds it critical to deter the unlawful posting of outdoor advertising materials and displaying of billboards for the State to maintain and promote cleaner, safer, and more attractive public spaces and roadways to benefit community safety and security. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to increase penalties for any person who violates the State's laws relating to the display of billboards or any outdoor advertising device. SECTION 2.  Section 445-121, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) Any person violating any provision of sections 445‑111 to 445-121 shall be fined not less than [$25] $100 nor more than [$500,] $1,000 or imprisoned not more than one month, or both." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________